Lecture7/arabic.twolc
Alphabet
    a i u b d k r s t V:a V:i V:u C:0 C:t C:r
        %<VERB1%>:0 %<VERB2%>:0 %<ACTIVE%>:0 %<PASSIVE%>:0 ;

Rule-variables Cc ;

Sets
    Cons = b d k r s t ;

Rules

"Active voice CaCaC pattern"
<[ Cons V:a Cons C: V:a Cons ]> <==> _ : %<ACTIVE%>:0 ;

"Passive voice CuCiC pattern"
<[ Cons V:u Cons C: V:i Cons ]> <==> _ : %<PASSIVE%>:0 ;

"Form 1 single middle consonant"
C:0 <=> _ :* %<VERB1%>:0 ;

"Form 2 double middle consonant"
C:Cc <=> Cc _ :* %<VERB2%>:0 ; where Cc in Cons ;
